Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.77.065

Council to administer certain federal programs.

The council may administer any federal act pertaining to higher education which is not administered by another state agency.

[ 2012 c 229 s 117; 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 108; 1985 c 370 s 21; 1975 1st ex.s. c 132 s 12. Prior: 1969 ex.s. c 263 s 3. Formerly RCW 28B.76.510, 28B.80.210, 28.90.120, 28B.81.030.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 229 ss 101, 117, 401, 402, 501 through 594, 601 through 609, 701 through 708, 801 through 821, 902, and 904: See note following RCW 28B.77.005.

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Effective date—Severability—1975 1st ex.s. c 132: See notes following RCW 28B.77.060.